Utah statutes.
61-2-8.   Discharge of associate broker or sales agent by principal broker
-- Notice.
If an associate broker or sales agent is discharged by a principal broker, the
principal broker shall, within three days, send the division a signed
statement notifying the division of the discharge.  The principal broker shall
address a communication to the last-known residence address of that associate
broker or sales agent advising him that notice of his termination has been
delivered or sent to the division.  It is unlawful for any associate broker or
sales agent to perform any of the acts under this chapter, directly or
indirectly, from and after the date of receipt of the termination notice until
affiliation with a principal broker has been established.
